Utah statutes.
53A-3-415.   School board policy on detaining students after school.

(1)  Each local school board shall establish a policy on detaining students after regular school hours as a part of the districtwide discipline plan required under Section 53A-11-901.

(2)  The policy shall apply to elementary school students, grades kindergarten through six.  The board shall receive input from teachers, school administrators, and parents and guardians of the affected students before adopting the policy.

(3)  The policy shall provide for notice to the parent or guardian of a student prior to holding the student after school on a particular day.  The policy shall also provide for exceptions to the notice provision if detention is necessary for the student's health or safety.

